Utah statutes.
58-22-501.   Unlawful conduct.
"Unlawful conduct" includes:
(1)  using the title "professional engineer," "professional land surveyor,"
"land surveyor," "professional structural engineer," "structural engineer," or
any other words, letters, abbreviations, or designations which represent
recognized professional engineering disciplines indicating that the person
using them is a professional engineer, professional land surveyor, or
professional structural engineer if the person has not been licensed under
this chapter, except as provided in Subsection 58-22-305(1);
(2)  using the terms "engineering," "structural engineering," or "surveying"
or any similar words, letters, or abbreviations to describe the type of
activity performed or offered to be performed if the person has not been
licensed under this chapter, except as provided in Subsection 58-22-305(1);
(3)  engaging in or representing itself as engaging in the practice of
professional engineering, professional structural engineering, or professional
land surveying as a corporation, proprietorship, partnership, or limited
liability company, except as provided in Subsection 58-22-305(1);
(4)  engaging in the practice of engineering, structural engineering, or
surveying as set forth in Subsections 58-22-102(9), (11), and (14), if the
person has not been licensed under this chapter, except as provided in Section
58-1-307 or Subsections 58-3a-304(1)(b) through (f); or
(5)  a professional engineer engaging in the practice of structural
engineering as defined in Subsection 58-22-102(14)(a).
